apertium-spa-ast.spa.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?> 
<dictionary>
<alphabet>ÀÁÂÄÇÈÉÊËÌÍÎÏÑÒÓÔÖÙÚÛÜàáâäçèéêëìíîïñòóôöùúûüABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyz</alphabet> 
<sdefs>
    <sdef n="a"/>
    <sdef n="acr"       c="Acronimo"/>
    <sdef n="predet"    c="Pre-determinanate"/>
    <sdef n="detnt"     c="Determinanate neutro(?)"/>
    <sdef n="loc"       c="Ubicación"/>
    <sdef n="ant"       c="Antroponimo"/>
    <sdef n="al"        c="Otro (altre)"/>
    <sdef n="atn"       c="Atono"/>
    <sdef n="enc"       c="Enclitico"/>
    <sdef n="pro"       c="Proclitico"/>
    <sdef n="tn"        c="Tonico"/>
    <sdef n="n"         c="Nombre"/>
    <sdef n="np"        c="Nombre propio"/>
    <sdef n="adj"       c="Adjectivo"/>
    <sdef n="f" 	    c="Femenino"/>
    <sdef n="m" 	    c="Masculino"/>
    <sdef n="mf" 	    c="Masculino / femenino"/>
    <sdef n="sg" 	    c="Singular"/>
    <sdef n="pl" 	    c="Plural"/>
    <sdef n="adv" 	    c="Adverbio"/>
    <sdef n="preadv" 	c="Preadverbio"/>
    <sdef n="pr" 	    c="Preposicion"/>
    <sdef n="prn" 	    c="Pronombre"/>
    <sdef n="rel" 	    c="Relativo"/>
    <sdef n="nn" 	    c="Inanimado"/>
    <sdef n="an" 	    c="Animado / inanimado"/>
    <sdef n="aa" 	    c="Animado"/>
    <sdef n="ind" 	    c="Indefinido"/>
    <sdef n="itg" 	    c="Interrogativo"/>
    <sdef n="det" 	    c="Determinante"/>
    <sdef n="dem" 	    c="Demonstrativo"/>
    <sdef n="def" 	    c="Definite"/>
    <sdef n="cnjcoo" 	c="Conjunción Co-ordinativa"/>
    <sdef n="cnjsub" 	c="Conjunción Subordinativa"/>
    <sdef n="cnjadv" 	c="Conjunción Adverbial"/>
    <sdef n="nt" 	    c="Neutro"/>
    <sdef n="vbser" 	c="Verbo Ser 'to be'"/>
    <sdef n="vbhaver" 	c="Verbo Tener 'to have'"/>
    <sdef n="vblex" 	c="Verbo"/>
    <sdef n="inf" 	    c="Infinitivo"/>
    <sdef n="infps"     c="Infinitivo Personal"/>
    <sdef n="ger" 	    c="Gerundio"/>
    <sdef n="gerps"     c="Gerundio Personal"/>
    <sdef n="pp" 	    c="Participio Pasado"/>
    <sdef n="pri" 	    c="Presente indicativo"/>
    <sdef n="p1" 	    c="Primera persona"/>
    <sdef n="p2" 	    c="Segunda persona"/>
    <sdef n="p3" 	    c="Third person"/>
    <sdef n="pii" 	    c="Imperfecto indicativo"/>
    <sdef n="ifi" 	    c="Preterito indicativo"/>
    <sdef n="fti" 	    c="Futuro indicativo"/>
    <sdef n="cni" 	    c="Condicional"/>
    <sdef n="prs" 	    c="Presente subjuntivo"/>
    <sdef n="pis" 	    c="Imperativo subjuntivo"/>
    <sdef n="fts" 	    c="Futuro subjuntivo"/>
    <sdef n="imp" 	    c="Imperativo"/>
    <sdef n="pos" 	    c="Posesivo"/>
    <sdef n="sp" 	    c="Singular / plural"/>
    <sdef n="ref" 	    c="Reflexivo"/>
    <sdef n="sup" 	    c="Superlativo"/>
    <sdef n="num" 	    c="Numeral"/>
    <sdef n="ij"    	c="Interjeccion"/>
    <sdef n="sent" 	    c="Marcador de frase"/>
    <sdef n="cm" 	    c="Coma"/>
    <sdef n="lpar" 	    c="Parentesis Izquierdo"/>
    <sdef n="rpar" 	    c="Parentesis Derecho"/>
    <sdef n="lquest" 	c="Marca de pregunta Izquierda"/>
</sdefs>
  <pardefs>

  <pardef n="numeros">
    <e>
<re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?(%)?</re>
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="num"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
  </pardef>
    <pardef n="personas">
      <!--
	  <e>
        <re>[A-ZÁÉÍÓÚ][a-záéíóú]+ [A-ZÁÉÍÓÚ][a-záéíóú]+</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
	  -->
      <e>
        <re>[A-ZÁÉÍÓÚ][a-záéíóú]+ [A-ZÁÉÍÓÚ][a-záéíóú]+ [A-ZÁÉÍÓÚ][a-záéíóú]+</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
	  <e>
        <re>[A-ZÁÉÍÓÚ][abcdefghijklmnñopqrstuvwzáéíóú]+ [A-ZÁÉÍÓÚ][a-záéíóú]+ [A-ZÁÉÍÓÚ][a-záéíóú]+ [A-ZÁÉÍÓÚ][a-záéíóú]+</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
	  
	</pardef>  
    <pardef n="urls">
      <e>
        <re>(((www.)|(http://))[a-z\-]+([.][a-z\-]+)+)</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="al"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="emails">
      <e>
        <re>[a-z.]+@[a-z.]+</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="al"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>	
  <pardef n="separa">
    <e>
<re>[.\?;:!]</re>
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="sent"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="coma">
    <e>
<re>,</re>
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="cm"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="separ">
    <e>
<re>¿</re>
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="lquest"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="paresq">
    <e>
<re>[\(\[]</re>
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="lpar"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="pardret">
    <e>
<re>[\)\]]</re>
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="rpar"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="S__sabiéndole">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>me</l>
        <r>me<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nos</l>
        <r>nos<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>os</l>
        <r>os<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="S__sabiéndose">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>les</l>
        <r>le<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>le</l>
        <r>le<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>las</l>
        <r>lo<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>la</l>
        <r>lo<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>los</l>
        <r>lo<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>lo</l>
        <r>lo<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="S__sabiéndome">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>les</l>
        <r>le<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>le</l>
        <r>le<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="S(1)__sabiéndome">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>las</l>
        <r>lo<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>la</l>
        <r>lo<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>los</l>
        <r>lo<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>lo</l>
        <r>lo<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="S__sabiéndoos">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>las</l>
        <r>lo<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>la</l>
        <r>lo<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>los</l>
        <r>lo<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>lo</l>
        <r>lo<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nos</l>
        <r>nos<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
  </pardef>

    <e><par n="separa"/></e>
    <e><par n="numeros"/></e>
 <e><par n="personas"/></e>
    <e><par n="urls"/></e>
    <e><par n="emails"/></e>
    <e><par n="coma"/></e>
    <e><par n="paresq"/></e>
    <e><par n="pardret"/></e>
    <e><par n="separ"/></e>
